test/src/morphology/mrj1933-test-N-patja_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - патьа: # Noun '??'
     патьа+N+Sg+Nom: патьа
     патьа+N+Sg+Gen: патьан
     патьа+N+Sg+Dat: патьалан
     патьа+N+Sg+Acc: патьам
     патьа+N+Sg+Lat: патьаэш
     патьа+N+Sg+Ill: патьашкы
     патьа+N+Sg+Ine: патьашты
     патьа+N+Sg+Com: патьагэ
     патьа+N+Sg+Abe: патьатэ
     патьа+N+Sg+Cmp: патьала
     патьа+N+Pl+Nom: патьавлӓ
     патьа+N+Pl+Gen: патьавлӓн
     патьа+N+Pl+Dat: патьавлӓлӓн
     патьа+N+Pl+Acc: патьавлӓм
     патьа+N+Pl+Lat: патьавлӓш
     патьа+N+Pl+Ill: патьавлӓшкӹ
     патьа+N+Pl+Ine: патьавлӓштӹ
     патьа+N+Pl+Com: патьавлӓге
     патьа+N+Pl+Abe: патьавлӓде
     патьа+N+Pl+Cmp: патьавлӓлӓ

#патьат, патьаэт, патьаэтшӹ, 
#патьажӹ, 
###
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: патьаэм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Gen: патьаэмӹн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Dat: патьаэмлӓн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Acc: патьаэмӹм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat: патьаэшэм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Ill: патьашкэм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Ine: патьаштэм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Com: патьаэмгэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abe: патьаэмтэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Cmp: патьаэмлӓ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: патьавлӓэм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Gen: патьавлӓэмӹн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: патьавлӓэмлӓн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Acc: патьавлӓэмӹм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat: патьавлӓэшэм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Ill: патьавлӓшкэм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Ine: патьавлӓштэм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com: патьавлӓэмгэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abe: патьавлӓэмтэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Cmp: патьавлӓэмлӓ

###
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: патьаэт
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Gen: патьаэдӹн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Dat: патьаэтлӓн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Acc: патьаэдӹм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat: патьаэшэт
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Ill: патьашкэт
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Ine: патьаштэт
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Com: патьаэткэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abe: патьаэттэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Cmp: патьаэтлӓ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: патьавлӓэт
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Gen: патьавлӓэдӹн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Dat: патьавлӓэтлӓн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Acc: патьавлӓэдӹм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat: патьавлӓэшэт
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Ill: патьавлӓшкэт
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Ine: патьавлӓштэт
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Com: патьавлӓэткэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abe: патьавлӓэттэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Cmp: патьавлӓэтлӓ
###
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: патьажӹ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Gen: патьажӹн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Dat: патьажӹлӓн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Acc: патьажӹм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat: патьаэшӹжӹ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Ill: патьашкӹжӹ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Ine: патьаштӹжӹ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Com: патьажӹгэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abe: патьажӹтэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Cmp: патьажӹлӓ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: патьавлӓжӹ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen: патьавлӓӹн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat: патьавлӓжӹлӓн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc: патьавлӓэдӹм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat: патьавлӓэшӹжӹ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Ill: патьавлӓшкӹжӹ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Ine: патьавлӓштӹжӹ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com: патьавлӓжӹгэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abe: патьавлӓжӹтэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Cmp: патьавлӓжӹлӓ
###
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: патьана
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Gen: патьанан
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Dat: патьаналан
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Acc: патьанам
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat: патьаэшнӓ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Ill: патьашкына
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Ine: патьаштына
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Com: патьанагэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abe: патьанатэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Cmp: патьанала
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: патьавлӓнӓ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Gen: патьавлӓнӓн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Dat: патьавлӓнӓлӓн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Acc: патьавлӓнӓм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat: патьавлӓэшнӓ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Ill: патьавлӓшкӹнӓ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Ine: патьавлӓштӹнӓ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Com: патьавлӓнӓгэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abe: патьавлӓнӓтэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Cmp: патьавлӓнӓлӓ

###
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: патьада
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Gen: патьадан
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Dat: патьадалан
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Acc: патьадам
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat: патьаэштӓ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Ill: патьашкыда
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Ine: патьаштыда
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Com: патьадагэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abe: патьадатэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Cmp: патьадалӓ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: патьавлӓдӓ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Gen: патьавлӓдӓн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Dat: патьавлӓдӓлӓн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Acc: патьавлӓдӓм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat: патьавлӓэштӓ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Ill: патьавлӓшкӹдӓ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Ine: патьавлӓштӹдӓ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Com: патьавлӓдӓгэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abe: патьавлӓдӓтэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Cmp: патьавлӓдӓлӓ
###
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: патьашты
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Gen: патьаштын
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Dat: патьаштылӓн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Acc: патьаштым
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat: патьаэшӹштӹ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Ill: патьашкышты
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Ine: патьаштышты
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Com: патьаштыгэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abe: патьаштытэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Cmp: патьаштыла
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: патьавлӓштӹ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Gen: патьавлӓштӹн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Dat: патьавлӓштӹлӓн
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Acc: патьавлӓштӹм
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat: патьавлӓэшӹштӹ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Ill: патьавлӓшкӹштӹ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Ine: патьавлӓштӹштӹ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Com: патьавлӓштӹгэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abe: патьавлӓштӹтэ
     патьа+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Cmp: патьавлӓштӹлӓ
